Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1823
Compact Privilege.

(1) A person holding a Compact Privilege under the Dietitian Licensure Compact may engage in the Practice of Dietetics in Nebraska as authorized pursuant to such compact.

(2) The board may approve, and the department may adopt and promulgate, rules and regulations as necessary to carry out this section.

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 9.
Dietitian Licensure Compact, see section 38-4701.